Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-601
Department of Health and Human Services; powers.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall have general supervision and control over matters relating to public health and sanitation and shall provide for examination as provided in section 81-602 and have supervision over all matters of quarantine and quarantine regulations.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. I, § 1, p. 750;

C.S.1922, § 8159;

C.S.1929, § 81-5601;

Laws 1933, c. 149, § 5, p. 575;

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 8, p. 560;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-927;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-5601;

R.S.1943, § 81-601;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 840;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 730.

Under former act, orders of board of health were subject to judicial review. Mathews v. Hedlund, 82 Neb. 825, 119 N.W. 17 (1908); Munk v. Frink, 81 Neb. 631, 116 N.W. 525 (1908).